Alaska statutes. Title 40. Public Records and Recorders.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Cross references. —

For the legislative purpose of the 1998 amendments adding AS

40.15.900

, see § 1, ch. 40, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 40.15.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“monument” means a fixed physical object marking a point on the surface of the earth used to commence or control a survey or to establish a lot corner;

“plat” means a map or delineated representation of a tract or parcel of land showing the subdivision of land into lots, blocks, streets, or other divisions;

“street” means an access way in common use including all of the land lying within a dedicated right-of-way as delineated on a plat showing streets, whether improved or unimproved;

“subdivision”

means the division of a tract or parcel of land into two or more lots by the landowner or by the creation of public access, excluding common carrier and public utility access;

does not include cadastral plats or cadastral control plats created by or on behalf of the United States Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management, regardless of whether these plats include easements or other public dedications;

“surveyor” means an individual licensed to practice land surveying in the state under AS 08.48.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.